Utah statutes.
59-18-110.   Election and consent to release of trust to specified
charitable organization.
A trustee of a trust for the benefit of a public charitable organization or
organizations may, with the consent of such organization or organizations,
come under Subsection 59-18-109 (5) by filing an election, accompanied by the
consents, with the attorney general.  Thereafter, the trust shall be subject
to Subsection 59-18-109(5) and Section 59-18-111.
